District of Columbia statutes.
42-3109

Evidence of reputation.

In an action brought under this chapter, evidence of general reputation of the property or tenants is admissible for the purpose of proving a drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related nuisance, and for the purpose of proving the knowledge of the defendant of the nuisance.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-194, § 10, 45 DCR 7982
Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-81, § 3(b), 53 DCR 1050
Nov. 6, 2010, D.C. Law 18-259, § 7(b), 57 DCR 5591

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-3309.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-81 substituted “drug or prostitution-related” for “drug-related”.
D.C. Law 18-259 substituted “drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related” for “drug or prostitution-related”.

Temporary Addition of Section

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3101.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of chapter, see notes to § 42-3101.